Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.230

Conditions and contracts of employment—Transfer of administrator to subordinate certificated position—Notice—Procedure.

Any certificated employee of a school district employed as an assistant superintendent, director, principal, assistant principal, coordinator, or in any other supervisory or administrative position, hereinafter in this section referred to as "administrator", shall be subject to transfer, at the expiration of the term of his or her employment contract, to any subordinate certificated position within the school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in this section, shall mean any administrative or nonadministrative certificated position for which the annual compensation is less than the position currently held by the administrator.

Every superintendent determining that the best interests of the school district would be served by transferring any administrator to a subordinate certificated position shall notify that administrator in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification shall state the reason or reasons for the transfer, and shall identify the subordinate certificated position to which the administrator will be transferred. Such notice shall be served upon the administrator personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein.

Every such administrator so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the president or chair, or secretary of the board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with the board of directors in an executive session thereof for the purpose of requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent. Such board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and shall notify the administrator in writing of the date, time and place of the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such meeting the administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or her request for reconsideration. The administrator and the board may invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate at the meeting. The board shall notify the administrator in writing of its final decision within ten days following its meeting with the administrator. No appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to transfer an administrator to a subordinate certificated position: PROVIDED, That in the case of principals such transfer shall be made at the expiration of the contract year and only during the first three consecutive school years of employment as a principal by a school district; except that if any such principal has been previously employed as a principal by another school district in the state of Washington for three or more consecutive school years the provisions of this section shall apply only to the first full school year of such employment.

This section applies to any person employed as an administrator by a school district on June 25, 1976, and to all persons so employed at any time thereafter, except that RCW 28A.405.245 applies to persons first employed after June 10, 2010, as a principal by a school district meeting the criteria of RCW 28A.405.245. This section provides the exclusive means for transferring an administrator subject to this section to a subordinate certificated position at the expiration of the term of his or her employment contract.

[ 2016 c 85 s 3; 2010 c 235 s 304; 2009 c 57 s 3; 1996 c 201 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 392; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.67.073.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 85: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Effective date—2009 c 57: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.